Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 25.2 Ballot Question Advocacy and Reporting

17-25.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Ballot Question Advocacy and Reporting Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.

17-25.2-2.
Declaration of policy.

It is declared to be in the public interest and to be the policy of the state to foster greater participation in ballot question advocacy in a transparent and open manner and to provide the public with sufficient information regarding the source of contributions received and expenditures made for ballot question advocacy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.

17-25.2-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Ballot question” means any question, charter change, constitutional amendment, referendum or voter initiated petition placed on any state, district, city, town or municipal ballot for a general or special election.

“Ballot question advocacy” means advocating the passage or defeat of a ballot question.

“Ballot question advocate” means (i) for purposes of referenda as defined in §

17-5-1

of the general laws only, any exempt nonprofit as defined in §

17-25-3

or any organization described under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the United States; and (ii) for all other ballot questions as defined herein, any person making an expenditure with a cumulative total that exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000) in a calendar year for ballot-question advocacy on a particular ballot question.

“Contributions” means donations to a ballot-question advocate in the form of money, gifts, loans, paid personal services, or in-kind contributions as defined herein.

“In-Kind Contributions” means the monetary value of other things of value or paid personal services donated to any person required to file reports with the board of elections, except for newsletters and other communications paid for and transmitted by an organization to its own members and not to the general public;

“Paid personal services” means personal services of every kind and nature, the cost or consideration for which is paid or provided by someone other than the ballot-question advocate for whom the services are rendered, but shall not include personal services provided without compensation by persons volunteering their time.

“Expenditures” means the payment for any goods and services for the purpose of ballot-question advocacy as set forth in this paragraph:

Any media advertising services or products, including, but not limited to, newspapers, radio stations or television stations;

General advertising in letters, brochures, flyers, handbills, lawn signs, posters, bumper stickers, buttons or other materials except for newsletters and other communications paid for and transmitted by an organization to its own members and not to the general public; or

Paid personal services donated to any ballot-question advocate including advertising agency services or other professional services including accounting services, printing, secretarial services, public opinion polls, research and professional campaign consultation or management, media production or computer services. A written contract, agreement or promise to make an expenditure, is an expenditure as of the date such contract expenditure or obligation is made.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation, city, town, or other governmental unit and any other organization.

“Election cycle” means the twenty-four (24) month period commencing on January 1 of odd number years and ending on December 31 of even number years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 446, § 4.

17-25.2-4.
No limitations on contributions or expenditures.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit the amount of monies contributed to or expended by a ballot-question advocate for the purpose of ballot-question advocacy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.

17-25.2-5.
Reporting by ballot question advocates.

Every ballot-question advocate shall file periodic reports signed by an individual responsible for its contents on a form prescribed by the board of elections setting forth the name and address of the ballot-question advocate, including any other name under which the ballot-question advocate conducts ballot-question advocacy, the name and address of the person filing the report; and

The name, address and, if applicable, the place of employment of each person making a contribution or contributions that in the aggregate exceed one thousand-eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per election cycle to a ballot-question advocate for purposes of ballot question advocacy and the amount contributed by each person or source; provided, however, this information shall be reported only if:

The contributions received by a ballot-question advocate are solicited in any way, including by written, electronic, or verbal means, by the ballot-question advocate specifically for ballot-question advocacy; or

The contributions were specifically designated by the contributor for ballot-question advocacy; or

The ballot question advocate knew or had reason to know that the contributor intended or expected that the majority of the contributions be used for ballot question advocacy; and

The name and address of every person or entity receiving an expenditure for ballot-question advocacy, which in the aggregate exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), the amount of each expenditure for ballot-question advocacy, and the total amount of expenditures for ballot-question advocacy made by the ballot-question advocate as of the last report date; and

A statement of the position of the ballot-question advocate in support of or opposition to the ballot-question; and

The names and addresses of all identified members or endorsing organizations, corporations, and/or associations that authorize the ballot-question advocate to represent to the public that they support the positions of the ballot-question advocate; and

The name and address of at least one of the officers of the ballot question advocate, if any, or one individual that is responsible for the ballot question advocate’s compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

The first report must be filed by a ballot-question advocate for the period beginning when the ballot-question advocate expends a cumulative total that exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000) for ballot-question advocacy and ending the last day of the first full month following such date, to be filed with the board of elections due no later than seven (7) days after the end of the month. A ballot-question advocate must thereafter file calendar month reports with the board of elections due no later than seven (7) days after the end of the month; provided, that in lieu of filing for the last full calendar month preceding the ballot question election, a report must be filed due no later than seven (7) days before the election.

A ballot-question advocate must file a final report of contributions received and expenditures made for ballot-question advocacy no later than thirty (30) days after the election for the ballot question is held subject to the provisions of §

17-25.2-6

. All reports filed with the board of elections must be received no later than 4:00 p.m. on the due date.

The board of elections may, for good cause shown and upon receipt of a written or electronic request, grant a seven (7) day extension for filing a report; provided, however, that the request must be received no later than the date and time upon which the report is due to be filed, and further if the election for the ballot question is to be held less than seven (7) days from the report due date and time, the report must be filed prior to the election date.

Any ballot-question advocate required to file reports with the board of elections pursuant to this section and who has not filed the report by the required date and time, unless granted an extension by the board, shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

The board of elections shall send a notice of noncompliance, by certified mail, to the ballot-question advocate who fails to file the reports required by this section. A ballot-question advocate that has been sent a notice of noncompliance and fails to file the required report within seven (7) days of the receipt of the notice shall be fined two dollars ($2.00) per day from the date of the receipt of the notice of noncompliance until the day the report is received by the board of elections. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this section, the board of election shall have the authority to waive late filing fees for good cause shown.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.

17-25.2-6.
Monies not expended on ballot measure.

At the time of the filing of the final report required by subsection

17-25.2-5(c)

, any contributions received for ballot question advocacy and remaining with a ballot question advocate that exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and have not been expended shall be disbursed in one or more of the following four (4) manners:

Transferal in whole or in part into another ballot question advocate account which has a purpose related to or consistent with that of the donating ballot question advocate;

Donations to or retention by a nonprofit organization recognized under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the United States as from time to time amended;

Donations to the state of Rhode Island; or

Refund to the donor.

The ballot question advocate must annually report to the board of elections by June 30 of the calendar year any such remaining contributions and shall report distributions of any such remaining contributions within thirty (30) days of such distributions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.

17-25.2-7.
Disclosure of true origin of contributions required.

No person shall make a contribution to a ballot-question advocate for the purpose of ballot-question advocacy in any name except its own or in any manner for the purpose of disguising the true origin of the contribution.

No person shall form or use a corporation or other legal entity to advocate for the approval or defeat of a ballot question with the intent to:

Disguise the true origin of the funds; or

Evade the reporting requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.

17-25.2-8.
Duties and powers of the board of elections.

The board of elections is authorized to perform any duties that are necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. Without limiting the generality of this provision, the board of elections is authorized and empowered to undertake all actions set forth in §

17-25-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.

17-25.2-9.
Penalties for violation.

Whenever the board of elections has reason to believe that a ballot-question advocate willfully and knowingly made a false statement in any report required under this chapter or failed to file any report, or has otherwise violated this chapter, the board of elections may, in addition to all other actions authorized by law, request the attorney general to bring an action in the name of the state of Rhode Island in the superior court against the person signing any such report and/or organization to enjoin them from continuing the violation, or doing any acts in furtherance of the violation, and for any other relief the court deems appropriate. In addition, the court may order the forfeiture of any and all contributions not reported in violation of this chapter.

The court may also impose a civil penalty for any violation of this chapter up to but not exceeding three (3) times the amount of:

Contributions and/or expenditures made or accepted in violation of this chapter; and/or

Contributions or expenditures not reported as required by this chapter.

All funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the fund established by the state for public information and education regarding the election process.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.

17-25.2-10.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof shall for any reason be judged invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder of the law, but shall be confined in its effect to the provisions or application directly involved in the controversy giving rise to the judgment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 2.